Illinois, session 104th, SB3499.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Capital Area Tourism Authority Act. 6    Section 5. Findings; purpose. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that:8        (1) The City of Springfield is the capital city of the 9    State of Illinois and the home of President Abraham 10    Lincoln.11        (2) The City of Springfield and Sangamon County 12    welcome visitors from around the world and are the 13    cornerstone of State government.14    (b) The purpose of this Act is to ensure that the City of 15Springfield has a vibrant hospitality industry that is capable 16of hosting visitors, legislative advocates, and those doing 17business with the State.  18    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:19    "Authority" means the Capital Area Tourism Authority 20established by this Act.21    "Board" means the Board of Trustees of the Authority.22    "Hotel operator" has the meaning given in the Hotel   SB3499- 2 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1Operators' Occupation Tax Act.2    "Local sales taxes" has the meaning given in the Statewide 3Innovation Development and Economy Act.4    "Master developer" has the meaning given in the Statewide 5Innovation Development and Economy Act.6    "Project costs" has the meaning given in the Statewide 7Innovation Development and Economy Act.8    "STAR bond district" has the meaning given in the 9Statewide Innovation Development and Economy Act.10    "STAR bond project" has the meaning given in the Statewide 11Innovation Development and Economy Act. 12    Section 15. Creation of the Authority. The Capital Area 13Tourism Authority is hereby created as a political subdivision 14and unit of local government for the benefit of the general 15public and the promotion of business, industry, commerce, and 16tourism in the City of Springfield, Sangamon County, and the 17State of Illinois. The Authority shall have only those powers 18described in Section 20 of this Act, and its territorial 19jurisdiction shall extend over all territory in the City of 20Springfield that is located within the boundaries of Walnut 21Street on the west, North Grand Avenue on the north, 11th 22Street on the east, and South Grand Avenue on the south. 23    Section 20. Powers and duties of the Authority. 24    (a) If and only if the Sangamon County Board, by   SB3499- 3 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1ordinance, imposes a tax under subsection (b-5) of Section 25-1030 of the Counties Code on all hotel operators who engage 3in business as a hotel operator within any STAR bond district 4that is established in the territory of the Authority and if 5the Sangamon County Board also resolves that all of the 6revenue generated from the tax under subsection (b-5) of 7Section 5-1030 of the Counties Code, as well as all of the tax 8receipts generated from local sales taxes within such a STAR 9bond district, shall be dedicated to the payment of the 10project costs for any STAR bond project in such a district and 11shall be considered pledged STAR revenues under the Statewide 12Innovation Development and Economy Act, then the Authority may 13exercise the powers set forth in subsection (c), as well as 14those powers ordinarily authorized by law, body politic, or 15municipal corporation for a political subdivision, for the 16purposes described in subsection (b).17    (b) The Authority shall use the powers conferred on it 18under this Section to assist in the development, construction, 19and acquisition of industrial or commercial projects within 20its territorial jurisdiction and to promote business, 21industry, commerce, and tourism within Sangamon County and the 22State of Illinois. 23    (c) If and only if the conditions described in subsection 24(a) are satisfied, then the Authority shall possess all powers 25of a body politic or municipal corporation necessary and 26convenient to accomplish the purpose of this Act, including,   SB3499- 4 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1but not limited to, the power: 2        (1) to exercise all of the powers afforded to a 3    political subdivision pursuant to Section 5-100 of the 4    Statewide Innovation Development and Economy Act in 5    connection with a STAR bond district, including, but not 6    limited to, establishing a STAR bond district and issuing 7    STAR bonds to finance a STAR bond project; 8        (2) to enter into loans, contracts, agreements, and 9    mortgages; 10        (3) to acquire by purchase, donation, or lease; to 11    own, convey, lease, sell, mortgage, or otherwise dispose 12    of interests in and to real or personal property; and to 13    grant or acquire licenses, easements, and options with 14    respect to property; 15        (4) to sue and be sued; 16        (5) to employ agents and employees necessary to carry 17    out this Act's purposes; 18        (6) to have, use, and alter a common seal; 19        (7) to acquire, own, construct, equip, finance, lease, 20    operate, and maintain grounds, buildings, facilities, 21    property or any portion of a building, facility, or 22    property owned or leased by the Authority to carry out the 23    purposes and duties of this Act and to fix, charge, and 24    collect fees, rents, and charges for the use of any 25    building, facility, property or portion thereof; 26        (8) to adopt all ordinances, resolutions, by-laws,   SB3499- 5 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1    rules, and regulations necessary or proper to carry into 2    effect the purpose of this Act and the powers granted to 3    the Authority; 4        (9) to apply for, accept, and expend grants, 5    appropriations, guarantees, donations of property or 6    labor, or any other thing of value; 7        (10) to exercise the right of eminent domain by 8    condemnation proceedings in the manner provided by the 9    Eminent Domain Act; 10        (11) to finance, construct, equip, own, operate, and 11    maintain any STAR bond project and to determine and direct 12    the use of the local tax contribution and the State tax 13    contribution for the approved STAR bond projects in the 14    STAR bond district; 15        (12) to pay or cause to be paid STAR bond project costs 16    and the principal and interest of any revenue bonds issued 17    by the Authority; 18        (13) to borrow money and to issue revenue bonds, 19    notes, or other evidences of indebtedness as provided for 20    in the Statewide Innovation Development and Economy Act; 21    and 22        (14) to exercise any and all other powers necessary to 23    effectuate the purposes of this Act. 24    Section 25. Board members; officers; governance. 25    (a) The governing and administrative powers of the   SB3499- 6 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1Authority shall be vested in its Board, which shall consist of 25 members appointed as follows: 3        (1) 3 members appointed by the Sangamon County Board;4        (2) one member appointed by the Springfield City 5    Council; and6        (3) one member appointed by the Springfield 7    Metropolitan Exposition and Auditorium Authority. 8    (b) All persons appointed as members of the Board shall be 9residents of Sangamon County and shall have recognized ability 10and experience in one or more of the following areas: economic 11development, finance, banking, commercial development, small 12business management, real estate development, community 13development, organized labor, units of local government, or 14civic, community, or neighborhood organization. 15    (c) The Chairperson of the Board shall be selected by a 16majority vote of the Board. 17    (d) The Sangamon County Board may remove any member of the 18Board in case of incompetency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance 19in office by a simple majority vote. 20    (e) Members of the Board shall hold office until their 21respective successors have been appointed. Any member may 22resign from his or her office. Vacancies shall be filled in the 23same manner as original appointments.24    (f) Members of the Board shall serve without compensation 25for their services as members but may be reimbursed for all 26necessary expenses incurred in connection with the performance   SB3499- 7 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1of their duties as members. 2    (g) The Board shall hold meetings quarterly or upon the 3call of the Chairperson of the Board or written notice of 3 4members of the Board. 5    (h) A majority of the appointed members of the Board shall 6constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and the 7Board may not meet or take any action without a quorum present. 8The affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at a 9meeting at which a quorum is present shall be necessary for any 10official act of the Authority.11    (i) All members of the Board and employees of the 12Authority are subject to the Illinois Governmental Ethics Act, 13in accordance with its terms, and shall submit a statement of 14economic interests in accordance with Article 4A of the 15Illinois Governmental Ethics Act. Additionally, each Board 16member shall disclose to the Board outside sources of income 17and any business relationships in economic development 18consulting or lobbying. Reporting shall include the source of 19income, services provided, and timeline of when services were 20provided. If the source of income is a firm or organization 21with multiple clients, the report shall list all of the 22entities for which the individual provided services.23    (j) The Board may appoint an Executive Director who shall 24have a background in finance, real estate or economic 25development, or administration. The Executive Director shall 26hold office at the discretion of the Board. The Executive   SB3499- 8 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1Director shall be the chief administrative and operational 2officer of the Authority, shall direct and supervise its 3administrative affairs and general management, shall perform 4such other duties as may be prescribed from time to time by the 5Board, and shall receive compensation fixed by the Board. The 6Executive Director shall attend all meetings of the Board; 7however, no action of the Board or the Authority shall be 8invalid on account of the absence of the Executive Director 9from a meeting. 10    Section 30. Open meetings; record disclosure. 11    (a) The Authority is subject to the Open Meetings Act and 12the Freedom of Information Act. All rules, regulations, 13ordinances, resolutions and all proceedings of the Authority 14and all documents and records in its possession shall be 15public records, and open to public inspection, except such 16documents and records as shall be kept or prepared by the Board 17for use in negotiations, actions, or proceedings to which the 18Authority is a party. 19    (b) A contract or agreement entered into by the Authority 20must be posted on the Authority's website. The Authority shall 21provide a detailed report of the Authority's financial 22information on the Authority's website. 23    Section 35. Limitations. If any of the Authority's powers 24are exercised within the territorial jurisdiction of any   SB3499- 9 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1municipality, all ordinances of that municipality shall remain 2in full force and effect and shall be controlling. 3    Section 40. Approval of STAR bond districts and STAR bond 4project. 5    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all real 6property in the territorial jurisdiction of the Authority 7shall automatically constitute an eligible area for purposes 8of approving a STAR bond district or STAR bond project in that 9jurisdiction under the Statewide Innovation Development and 10Economy Act, and the territorial boundaries of the STAR bond 11district may be entirely within the corporate limits of the 12City of Springfield. 13    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any number 14of STAR bond projects may be undertaken in a STAR bond district 15located in the territorial jurisdiction of the Authority 16provided that: 17        (1) each STAR bond project is approved under the 18    Statewide Innovation Development and Economy Act; and 19        (2) the local tax contribution and the State tax 20    contribution to the STAR bond projects are sufficient, 21    together with other pledged STAR revenues, to support the 22    financing of the STAR bond projects. 23    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to the 24extent that the local tax contribution and the State tax 25contribution, together with other available funds, aggregate   SB3499- 10 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1an amount that exceeds those funds required to pay any project 2costs, including debt service on the STAR bonds issued in 3connection with the STAR bond project, the Authority may 4direct such excess local tax contribution and State tax 5contribution to finance additional STAR bond projects in the 6same STAR bond district. 7    Section 45. State tax contribution. Notwithstanding any 8other provision of law, any State sales tax increment pledged 9to pay STAR bonds in any STAR bond district located in the 10territorial jurisdiction of the Authority shall not be limited 11to 50% of the total project costs in the STAR bond district but 12rather will cover up to 100% of the total project costs. 13    Section 50. Master developer. Notwithstanding any other 14provision of law, the Authority shall own and control any STAR 15bond project and acreage on which the project is located in any 16STAR Bond district created in the territorial jurisdiction of 17the Authority instead of the Master Developer as required in 18the Statewide Innovation Development and Economy Act. The 19Master Developer shall not be required to provide equity in 20such STAR bond project. 21    Section 55. Reports; commitment notice. The Authority 22shall annually submit a report of its finances to the Auditor 23General. The Authority shall annually submit a report of its   SB3499- 11 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1activities to the Governor and General Assembly. 2    The Authority shall provide notice to the General 3Assembly, the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, 4and the Governor once the Authority enters into a commitment 5to support the financing of a project. The notice to the 6General Assembly shall be filed with the Clerk of the House of 7Representatives and the Secretary of the Senate, in electronic 8form only, in the manner that the Clerk and the Secretary shall 9direct. 10    Section 60. Exemption from taxation. All property of the 11Authority is exempt from taxation by the State or taxing units 12of the State. 13    Section 65. Investigatory authority. The Board may 14investigate conditions in which it has an interest within the 15territorial jurisdiction of the Authority, the enforcement of 16its ordinances, rules and regulations, and the action, 17conduct, and efficiency of all officers, agents and employees 18of the Authority. In the conduct of such investigations the 19Board may hold public hearings on its own motion. Each member 20of the Board shall have power to administer oaths, and the 21secretary, by order of the Board, shall issue subpoenas to 22secure the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and the 23production of books and papers relevant to such investigations 24and to any hearing before the Board or any member of the Board.  SB3499- 12 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1    Any circuit court of this State, upon application of the 2Board or any Board member, may in its discretion compel the 3attendance of witnesses, the production of books and papers, 4and the giving of testimony before the Board or before any 5Board member or any officers' committee appointed by the 6Board, by attachment for contempt or otherwise in the same 7manner as the production of evidence may be compelled before 8the court.  9    Section 95. The Counties Code is amended by changing 10Section 5-1030 as follows: 11    (55 ILCS 5/5-1030)  (from Ch. 34, par. 5-1030)12    Sec. 5-1030. Hotel rooms, tax on gross rental receipts. 13    (a) The corporate authorities of any county may by 14ordinance impose a tax upon all persons engaged in such county 15in the business of renting, leasing or letting rooms in a hotel 16which is not located within a city, village, or incorporated 17town that imposes a tax under Section 8-3-14 of the Illinois 18Municipal Code, as defined in "The Hotel Operators' Occupation 19Tax Act", at a rate not to exceed 5% of the gross rental 20receipts from such renting, leasing or letting, excluding, 21however, from gross rental receipts, the proceeds of such 22renting, leasing or letting to permanent residents of that 23hotel, and may provide for the administration and enforcement 24of the tax, and for the collection thereof from the persons   SB3499- 13 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1subject to the tax, as the corporate authorities determine to 2be necessary or practicable for the effective administration 3of the tax.4    (b) With the consent of municipalities representing at 5least 67% of the population of Winnebago County, as determined 6by the 2010 federal decennial census and as expressed by 7resolution of the corporate authorities of those 8municipalities, the county board of Winnebago County may, by 9ordinance, impose a tax upon all persons engaged in the county 10in the business of renting, leasing, or letting rooms in a 11hotel that imposes a tax under Section 8-3-14 of the Illinois 12Municipal Code, as defined in the Hotel Operators' Occupation 13Tax Act, at a rate not to exceed 2% of the gross rental 14receipts from renting, leasing, or letting, excluding, 15however, from gross rental receipts, the proceeds of the 16renting, leasing, or letting to permanent residents of that 17hotel, and may provide for the administration and enforcement 18of the tax, and for the collection thereof from the persons 19subject to the tax, as the county board determines to be 20necessary or practicable for the effective administration of 21the tax. The tax shall be instituted on a county-wide basis and 22shall be in addition to any tax imposed by this or any other 23provision of law. The revenue generated under this subsection 24shall be accounted for and segregated from all other funds of 25the county and shall be utilized solely for either: (1) 26encouraging, supporting, marketing, constructing, or   SB3499- 14 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1operating, either directly by the county or through other 2taxing bodies within the county, sports, arts, or other 3entertainment or tourism facilities or programs for the 4purpose of promoting tourism, competitiveness, job growth, and 5for the general health and well-being of the citizens of the 6county; or (2) payment towards debt services on bonds issued 7for the purposes set forth in this subsection. 8    (b-5) The county board of Sangamon County may, by 9ordinance, impose a tax upon all persons engaged in the county 10in the business of renting, leasing, or letting rooms in a 11hotel that imposes a tax under Section 8-3-14 of the Illinois 12Municipal Code, as defined in the Hotel Operators' Occupation 13Tax Act, at a rate not to exceed 3% of the gross rental 14receipts from renting, leasing, or letting, excluding, 15however, from gross rental receipts, the proceeds of the 16renting, leasing, or letting to permanent residents of that 17hotel, and may provide for the administration and enforcement 18of the tax, and for the collection thereof from the persons 19subject to the tax, as the county board determines to be 20necessary or practicable for the effective administration of 21the tax. The tax shall be instituted on a county-wide basis and 22shall be in addition to any tax imposed by this or any other 23provision of law. The revenue generated under this subsection 24shall be accounted for and segregated from all other funds of 25the county and shall be used solely for either: (1) 26encouraging, supporting, marketing, constructing, or   SB3499- 15 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1operating, either directly by the county or through other 2taxing bodies within the county, sports, arts, or other 3entertainment or tourism facilities or programs for the 4purpose of promoting tourism, competitiveness, job growth, and 5for the general health and well-being of the citizens of the 6county; or (2) payment towards debt services on bonds issued 7for the purposes set forth in this subsection; or (3) the 8purposes described in the Capital Area Tourism Authority Act. 9    (c) A Tourism Facility Board shall be established, 10comprised of a representative from the county and from each 11municipality that has approved the imposition of the tax under 12subsection (b) of this Section.13        (1) A Board member's vote is weighted based on the 14    municipality's population relative to the population of 15    the county, with the county representing the population 16    within unincorporated areas of the county. Representatives 17    from the Rockford Park District and Rockford Area 18    Convention and Visitors Bureau shall serve as ex-officio 19    members with no voting rights.20        (2) The Board must meet not less frequently than once 21    per year to direct the use of revenues collected from the 22    tax imposed under subsection (b) of this Section that are 23    not already directed for use pursuant to an 24    intergovernmental agreement between the county and another 25    entity represented on the Board, including the ex-officio 26    members, and for any other reason the Board deems   SB3499- 16 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1    necessary. Affirmative actions of the Board shall require 2    a weighted vote of Board members representing not less 3    than 67% of the population of the county.4        (3) The Board shall not be a separate unit of local 5    government, shall have no paid staff, and members of the 6    Board shall receive no compensation or reimbursement of 7    expenses from proceeds of the tax imposed under subsection 8    (b) of this Section. 9    (d) Persons subject to any tax imposed pursuant to 10authority granted by this Section may reimburse themselves for 11their tax liability for such tax by separately stating such 12tax as an additional charge, which charge may be stated in 13combination, in a single amount, with State tax imposed under 14"The Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act".15    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize a 16county to impose a tax upon the privilege of engaging in any 17business which under the Constitution of the United States may 18not be made the subject of taxation by this State.19    An ordinance or resolution imposing a tax hereunder or 20effecting a change in the rate thereof shall be effective on 21the first day of the calendar month next following its passage 22and required publication.23    The amounts collected by any county pursuant to this 24Section shall be expended to promote tourism; conventions; 25expositions; theatrical, sports and cultural activities within 26that county or otherwise to attract nonresident overnight   SB3499- 17 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1visitors to the county.2    Any county may agree with any unit of local government, 3including any authority defined as a metropolitan exposition, 4auditorium and office building authority, fair and exposition 5authority, exposition and auditorium authority, or civic 6center authority created pursuant to provisions of Illinois 7law and the territory of which unit of local government or 8authority is co-extensive with or wholly within such county, 9to impose and collect for a period not to exceed 40 years, any 10portion or all of the tax authorized pursuant to this Section 11and to transmit such tax so collected to such unit of local 12government or authority. The amount so paid shall be expended 13by any such unit of local government or authority for the 14purposes for which such tax is authorized. Any such agreement 15must be authorized by resolution or ordinance, as the case may 16be, of such county and unit of local government or authority, 17and such agreement may provide for the irrevocable imposition 18and collection of said tax at such rate, or amount as limited 19by a given rate, as may be agreed upon for the full period of 20time set forth in such agreement; and such agreement may 21further provide for any other terms as deemed necessary or 22advisable by such county and such unit of local government or 23authority. Any such agreement shall be binding and enforceable 24by either party to such agreement. Such agreement entered into 25pursuant to this Section shall not in any event constitute an 26indebtedness of such county subject to any limitation imposed   SB3499- 18 -LRB104 20619 JDS 34112 b1by statute or otherwise.2(Source: P.A. 103-781, eff. 8-5-24.) 3    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 4severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.